District of Columbia statutes.
32-1009.01

Notice requirements for tipped wages.

(a)

An employer who employs an employee who is paid in accordance with § 32-1003(f) shall submit a quarterly wage report within 30 days of the end of each quarter to the Mayor certifying that the employee was paid the required minimum wage.

(b)

(1)

The Mayor shall create an Internet-based portal for online reporting of the quarterly wage reports required by subsection (a) of this section.

(2)

An employer shall submit its quarterly wage reports online unless the employer claims that online reporting creates a hardship, in which case the employer shall submit its reports in hard-copy form.

(3)

The Mayor shall provide reporting requirements training to educate employers about the reporting requirements and use of the Internet-based portal.

(c)

The Mayor shall:

(1)

Perform random reporting audits after each quarterly report deadline to ensure compliance; and

(2)

Submit an annual report to the Secretary to the Council of the compliance data collected.

History

Mar. 25, 1993, D.C. Law 9-248, § 10a
as added Mar. 11, 2014, D.C. Law 20-91, § 2(c), 61 DCR 778

Effect of Amendments

The 2014 amendment by D.C. Law 20-91 added this section.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 20-91 § 3, see § 7004 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-377, July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, 20 STAT 3696).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 20-91, § 3, see § 7004 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-449, October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, 20 STAT 4188).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 20-91, § 3, see § 7004 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 20-157, § 7, see § 4 of the Wage Theft Prevention Correction and Clarification Emergency Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-188, Oct. 27, 2015, 62 DCR 14224).

Editor's Notes

Section 3 of D.C. Law 20-91 was repealed by D.C. Law 20-155, § 7003, effective Feb. 26, 2015.

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-91: Section 3 of D.C. Law 20-91 provided that sections 2(b)-(d) of the act shall apply upon the inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan, as certified by the Chief Financial Officer to the Budget Director of the Council in a certification published by the Council in the District of Columbia Register.

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-157: Section 7 of D.C. Law 20-157 provided that the act shall apply as of October 1, 2014, and that the act shall apply to violations occurring after October 1, 2014.